Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Crime Victims’ Address Protection Program

14.300.
Definitions for KRS 14.300 to 14.318.

As used in KRS

14.300

to

14.318

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Address” means a residential street address, school address, or work address of an individual, as specified on the application of an individual to be a program participant under this section;

“Applicant” means a person applying for certification in the address confidentiality program under KRS

14.300

to

14.318

;

“Criminal offense against a victim who is a minor” has the same meaning as in KRS

17.500

;

“Domestic violence and abuse” has the same meaning as in KRS

403.720

;

“Program participant” means a person certified as a program participant under KRS

14.300

to

14.318

;

“Sex crime” means an offense or an attempt to commit an offense defined in:

KRS Chapter 510;

KRS

530.020

;

KRS 530.064(1)(a);

KRS

531.310

;

KRS

531.320

; or

Any criminal attempt to commit an offense specified in this subsection, regardless of the penalty for the attempt;

“Specified offense” means:

Domestic violence and abuse;

Stalking;

A sex crime;

A criminal offense against a victim who is a minor;

A similar federal offense; or

A similar offense from another state or territory; and

“Stalking” means conduct prohibited under KRS

508.140

and

508.150

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

14.302.
Crime victims’ address protection program — Program open to victims of domestic violence and abuse, stalking, and felony sex offenses — Criminal history background check and fingerprinting of Department of State employees administering program.

On or after July 1, 2013, the Secretary of State shall create a crime victim address protection program.

The crime victim address protection program shall be open to victims of a specified offense who are United States citizens and residents of Kentucky, without any cost to the program participant.

The Secretary of State shall require that each person employed in the Office of the Secretary of State directly responsible for the administration of the crime victim address protection program submit his or her fingerprints to the Department of State. The Department of State shall exchange fingerprint data with the Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to conduct a criminal history background check of each employee directly responsible for the administration of the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.

14.304.
Permit crime victims to use for voting purposes an address provided by the Secretary of State rather than person’s actual physical address — Request to participate in program to include sworn statement of endangerment — Two year certification period for program participants — Administrative regulation to govern renewal of certification — Penalty for providing false information — Addresses exempt from disclosure under Open Records Law.

Upon the creation of the crime victim address protection program, an applicant, a parent or guardian acting on behalf of a minor, a guardian acting on behalf of a person who is declared incompetent, or a designee of an applicant or a parent or guardian of a minor or a guardian of a person declared incompetent who cannot for any reason apply themselves, may apply to the Secretary of State to have an address designated by the Secretary of State serve for voting purposes as the address of the applicant, the minor, or the incompetent person. The Secretary of State shall approve an application if it is filed in the manner and on the form prescribed by the Secretary of State by administrative regulation and if it contains:

A sworn statement by the applicant that:

The applicant or the minor or the incompetent person on whose behalf the application is made is a victim of a specified offense in an ongoing criminal case or in a criminal case that resulted in a conviction by a judge or jury or by a defendant’s guilty plea; or

The applicant or the minor or the incompetent person on whose behalf the application is made has been granted an order of protection as defined in KRS

403.720

and

456.010

by a court of competent jurisdiction within the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the order is in effect at the time of application;

A sworn statement by the applicant that disclosure of the address of the applicant would endanger the safety of the applicant or the safety of the children of the applicant, or the minor or incompetent person on whose behalf the application is made.

The mailing address and the phone number or numbers where the applicant can be contacted by the Secretary of State;

The new address or addresses that the applicant requests not be disclosed for the reason that disclosure will increase the risk of a specified offense; and

The signature of the applicant and of a representative of any office designated under KRS

14.310

as a referring agency who assisted in the preparation of the application, and the date on which the applicant signed the application.

Applications shall be filed with the Office of the Secretary of State.

Upon the filing of a properly completed application, the Secretary of State shall certify the applicant as a program participant if the applicant is not required to register as a sex offender or is not otherwise prohibited from participating in the program.

Applicants shall be certified for two (2) years following the date of filing unless the certification is withdrawn or invalidated before that date. The Secretary of State shall promulgate an administrative regulation to establish a renewal procedure.

A person who falsely attests in an application that disclosure of the address of the applicant would endanger the safety of the applicant or the safety of the children of the applicant, or the minor or incompetent person on whose behalf the application is made, or who knowingly provides false or incorrect information upon making an application may be found guilty of a violation of KRS

523.030

.

The addresses of individuals applying for entrance into the crime victim address confidentiality program and the addresses of those certified as program participants shall be exempt from disclosure under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to KRS

61.884

.

A program participant shall notify the Office of the Secretary of State of a change of address within seven (7) days of the change of address.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 102, § 37, effective January 1, 2016.

14.306.
Grounds for cancellation of a program participant’s certification — Notice of cancellation — Appeal — Voluntary withdrawal from program — Procedure to ensure that request for withdrawal is legitimate — Administrative regulations.

The Secretary of State may cancel certification of a program participant if within fourteen (14) days:

From the date of the program participant changing his or her name, the program participant fails to notify the Secretary of State that he or she has obtained a name change; however, the program participant may reapply under his or her new name; or

From the date of changing his or her address, the program participant fails to notify the Secretary of State of the change of address.

The Secretary of State shall cancel certification of a program participant who applies using false information.

The Secretary of State shall send notice of certification cancellation to the program participant. The notice of certification cancellation shall set out the reasons for cancellation. The program participant has the right to appeal the decision within thirty (30) days under procedures established by the Office of the Secretary of State by administrative regulation.

The Secretary of State shall cancel certification of a program participant who is required to register as a sex offender.

A program participant may withdraw from the program by providing the Secretary of State with notice of his or her intention to withdraw from the program. The Secretary of State shall promulgate by administrative regulations a secure procedure by which to ensure that the program participant’s request for withdrawal is legitimate.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 4, effective June 25, 2013.

14.308.
Confidentiality of program participant’s records — Exceptions authorizing disclosure.

The Secretary of the State shall not make available for inspection or copying any records in a file of a program participant, other than the address designated by the Secretary of State, except under the following circumstances:

If directed by a court order signed by a judge or justice of a court of competent jurisdiction within the Commonwealth of Kentucky; or

Upon written request by the chief law enforcement officer of a city or county, or the commander of a Department of Kentucky State Police post or branch, if related to an ongoing official investigation. Requests shall include the reason the information is needed by the law enforcement agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 5, effective June 25, 2013.

14.310.
Secretary of State to establish list of state, local, and nonprofit agencies providing counsel and shelter to program participants — Assistance not to be deemed legal advice.

The Secretary of State shall establish a list of state and local agencies and nonprofit agencies that provide counseling and shelter services to victims of a specified offense to assist persons applying to be program participants. Any assistance and counseling rendered to applicants by the Office of the Secretary of State or its designees shall in no way be construed as legal advice.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 6, effective June 25, 2013.

14.312.
Program participants to vote by mail-in absentee ballot — Modification of county clerk’s system to safeguard confidentiality of participant’s voting records — No waiver or modification of legal qualifications to vote.

A program participant who is otherwise qualified to vote may register to vote and apply for and submit a mail-in absentee ballot under this section.

Using the authority granted under KRS 14.318(1), the State Board of Elections shall design a system allowing a county clerk to shield from public view all voting records of a program participant, including the name and address of a program participant, and allowing a program participant to vote by mail-in absentee ballot. This authority may be used to modify statutory or regulatory requirements that would lead to disclosure of the program participant’s name and address, but shall not include authority to waive or modify any other requirements relative to the program participant’s qualifications to vote, including age and geographic residency.

The program participant may receive mail-in absentee ballots for all elections in the jurisdiction in which that individual resides in the same manner as a person requesting an absentee ballot under KRS 117.085(1)(a). The county clerk shall transmit a mail-in absentee ballot to the program participant at the address designated by the participant in his or her application.

Neither the name nor the address of a program participant shall be included in any list of registered voters available to the public, including any list inspected under KRS

116.095

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 7, effective June 25, 2013.

14.314.
Prior custody or visitation orders not affected by program or by this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter, nor participation in the program created in this chapter, shall affect custody or visitation orders in effect prior to or during program participation.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 8, effective June 25, 2013.

14.316.
Limitation of liability for negligent disclosure of program participant’s actual address.

No actionable duty or any right of action shall accrue against the state, a county, a municipality, an agency of the state or county or municipality, or an employee of the state or county or municipality in the event of negligent disclosure of a program participant’s actual address.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 9, effective June 25, 2013.

14.318.
Administrative regulations to be promulgated by State Board of Elections and Secretary of State to implement KRS 14.300 to 14.318.

The State Board of Elections may promulgate administrative regulations to implement KRS

14.312

and

117.085

.

The Secretary of State may promulgate administrative regulations to implement KRS

14.300

to

14.310

,

14.314

, and

14.316

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 87, § 10, effective June 25, 2013.